Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 16. Psychiatric Treatment of Minors Act.
§ 16.1-340.2.
Transportation of minor in the temporary detention process.

In specifying the primary law-enforcement agency and jurisdiction for purposes of this section, the magistrate shall specify in the temporary detention order the law-enforcement agency of the jurisdiction in which the minor resides to execute the order and, in cases in which transportation is ordered to be provided by the primary law-enforcement agency, provide transportation. However, if the nearest boundary of the jurisdiction in which the minor resides is more than 50 miles from the nearest boundary of the jurisdiction in which the minor is located, the law-enforcement agency of the jurisdiction in which the minor is located shall execute the order and provide transportation.

The magistrate issuing the temporary detention order shall specify the law-enforcement agency to execute the order and provide transportation. However, the magistrate may authorize transportation by an alternative transportation provider, including a parent, family member, or friend of the minor who is the subject of the temporary detention order, a representative of the community services board, or other transportation provider with personnel trained to provide transportation in a safe manner upon determining, following consideration of information provided by the petitioner; the community services board or its designee; the local law-enforcement agency, if any; the minor’s treating physician, if any; or other persons who are available and have knowledge of the minor, and, when the magistrate deems appropriate, the proposed alternative transportation provider, either in person or via two-way electronic video and audio or telephone communication system, that the proposed alternative transportation provider is available to provide transportation, willing to provide transportation, and able to provide transportation in a safe manner. When transportation is ordered to be provided by an alternative transportation provider, the magistrate shall order the specified primary law-enforcement agency to execute the order, to take the minor into custody, and to transfer custody of the minor to the alternative transportation provider identified in the order.In such cases any case in which a magistrate authorizes transportation of a minor subject to a temporary detention order by an alternative transportation provider, a copy of the temporary detention order shall accompany the minor being transported pursuant to this section at all times and shall be delivered by the alternative transportation provider to the temporary detention facility. The temporary detention facility shall return a copy of the temporary detention order to the court designated by the magistrate as soon as is practicable. Delivery of an order to a law-enforcement officer or alternative transportation provider and return of an order to the court may be accomplished electronically or by facsimile.The order may include transportation of the minor to such other medical facility as may be necessary to obtain further medical evaluation or treatment prior to placement as required by a physician at the admitting temporary detention facility. Nothing herein shall preclude a law-enforcement officer or alternative transportation provider from obtaining emergency medical treatment or further medical evaluation at any time for a minor in his custody as provided in this section. Such medical evaluation or treatment shall be conducted immediately in accordance with state and federal law.

If an alternative transportation provider providing transportation of a minor who is the subject of a temporary detention order becomes unable to continue providing transportation of the minor at any time after taking custody of the minor, the primary law-enforcement agency for the jurisdiction in which the alternative transportation provider is located at the time he becomes unable to continue providing transportation shall take custody of the minor and shall transport the minor to the facility of temporary detention. In such cases, (i) a copy of the temporary detention order shall accompany the minor being transported and shall be delivered to and returned by the temporary detention facility in accordance with the provisions of subsection B and (ii) if the alternative transportation provider originally authorized to provide transportation is a person other than the minor’s parent, the alternative transportation provider shall notify the minor’s parent (a) that the primary law-enforcement agency for the jurisdiction in which he is located has taken custody of the minor and is transporting the minor to the facility of temporary detention and (b) of the name of the law-enforcement officer providing transportation of the minor.

In cases in which an alternative facility of temporary detention is identified and the law-enforcement agency or alternative transportation provider identified to provide transportation in accordance with subsection B continues to have custody of the minor, the local law-enforcement agency or alternative transportation provider shall transport the minor to the alternative facility of temporary detention identified by the employee or designee of the local community services board. In cases in which an alternative facility of temporary detention is identified and custody of the minor has been transferred from the law-enforcement agency or alternative transportation provider that provided transportation in accordance with subsection B to the initial facility of temporary detention, the employee or designee of the local community services board shall request, and a magistrate may enter an order specifying, an alternative transportation provider or, if no alternative transportation provider is available, willing, and able to provide transportation in a safe manner, the local law-enforcement agency for the jurisdiction in which the minor resides or, if the nearest boundary of the jurisdiction in which the minor resides is more than 50 miles from the nearest boundary of the jurisdiction in which the minor is located, the law-enforcement agency of the jurisdiction in which the minor is located, to provide transportation.

The magistrate may change the transportation provider specified in a temporary detention order at any time prior to the initiation of transportation of a minor who is the subject of a temporary detention order pursuant to this section. If the designated transportation provider is changed by the magistrate at any time after the temporary detention order has been executed but prior to the initiation of transportation, the transportation provider having custody of the minor shall transfer custody of the minor to the transportation provider subsequently specified to provide transportation. For the purposes of this subsection, “transportation provider” includes both a law-enforcement agency and an alternative transportation provider.

A law-enforcement officer may lawfully go or be sent beyond the territorial limits of the county, city, or town in which he serves to any point in the Commonwealth for the purpose of executing any temporary detention order pursuant to this section. Law-enforcement agencies may enter into agreements to facilitate the execution of temporary detention orders and provide transportation.

No person who provides alternative transportation pursuant to this section shall be liable to the person being transported for any civil damages for ordinary negligence in acts or omissions that result from providing such alternative transportation.

History.

2010, cc. 778, 825; 2015, cc. 297, 308; 2018, c. 20; 2020, cc. 879, 880.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 297 and 308 are identical, and added subsection D.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 20 added subsection C and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 879 and 880 are identical, and inserted subsections C and E and redesignated accordingly.

§ 16.1-340.3.
Release of minor prior to commitment hearing for involuntary admission.

Prior to a hearing as authorized in §

16.1-341

, the judge may release the minor to his parent if it appears from all evidence readily available that the minor does not meet the commitment criteria specified in §

16.1-345

. The director of any facility in which the minor is detained may release the minor prior to a hearing as authorized in §

16.1-341

if it appears, based on an evaluation conducted by the psychiatrist or clinical psychologist treating the minor, that the minor would not meet the commitment criteria specified in §

16.1-345

if released.

History.

2010, cc. 778, 825.

§ 16.1-340.4.
Involuntary commitment; preadmission screening report.

The juvenile and domestic relations district court shall require a preadmission screening report from the community services board that serves the area where the minor resides or, if impractical, where the minor is located. The report shall be prepared by an employee or designee of the community services board. The report shall be admitted as evidence of the facts stated therein and shall state (i) whether the minor has mental illness and whether, because of mental illness, the minor (a) presents a serious danger to himself or others to the extent that severe or irremediable injury is likely to result, as evidenced by recent acts or threats, or (b) is experiencing a serious deterioration of his ability to care for himself in a developmentally age-appropriate manner, as evidenced by delusionary thinking or by a significant impairment of functioning in hydration, nutrition, self-protection, or self-control; (ii) whether the minor is in need of compulsory treatment for a mental illness and is reasonably likely to benefit from the proposed treatment; (iii) whether inpatient treatment is the least restrictive alternative that meets the minor’s needs; and (iv) the recommendations for the minor’s placement, care, and treatment including, where appropriate, recommendations for mandatory outpatient treatment. The board shall provide the preadmission screening report to the court prior to the hearing, and the report shall be admitted into evidence and made part of the record of the case.

History.

2010, cc. 778, 825.

§ 16.1-341.
Involuntary commitment; petition; hearing scheduled; notice and appointment of counsel.

A petition for the involuntary commitment of a minor may be filed with the juvenile and domestic relations district court serving the jurisdiction in which the minor is located by a parent or, if the parent is not available or is unable or unwilling to file a petition, by any responsible adult, including the person having custody over a minor in detention or shelter care pursuant to an order of a juvenile and domestic relations district court. The petition shall include the name and address of the petitioner and the minor and shall set forth in specific terms why the petitioner believes the minor meets the criteria for involuntary commitment specified in §

16.1-345

. To the extent available, the petition shall contain the information required by §

16.1-339

.1. The petition shall be taken under oath.If a commitment hearing has been scheduled pursuant to subdivision 3 of subsection C of §

16.1-339

, the petition for judicial approval filed by the facility under subsection C of §

16.1-339

shall serve as the petition for involuntary commitment as long as such petition complies in substance with the provisions of this subsection.

Upon the filing of a petition for involuntary commitment of a minor, the juvenile and domestic relations district court serving the jurisdiction in which the minor is located shall schedule a hearing which shall occur no sooner than 24 hours and no later than 96 hours from the time the petition was filed or from the issuance of the temporary detention order as provided in §

16.1-340.1

, whichever occurs later, or from the time of the hearing held pursuant to subsection C of §

16.1-339

if the commitment hearing has been conducted pursuant to subdivision C 3 of §

16.1-339

. If the 96-hour period expires on a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday or day on which the court is lawfully closed, the 96 hours shall be extended to the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday or day on which the court is lawfully closed. The attorney for the minor, the guardian ad litem for the minor, the attorney for the Commonwealth in the jurisdiction giving rise to the detention, and the juvenile and domestic relations district court having jurisdiction over any minor in detention or shelter care shall be given notice prior to the hearing.If the petition is not dismissed or withdrawn, copies of the petition, together with a notice of the hearing, shall be served immediately upon the minor and the minor’s parents, if they are not petitioners, by the sheriffs of the jurisdictions in which the minor and his parents are located. The hearing on the petition may proceed if the court determines that copies of the petition and notice of the hearing have been served on at least one parent and a reasonable effort has been made to serve such copies on both parents. No later than 24 hours before the hearing, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the minor and counsel to represent the minor, unless it has determined that the minor has retained counsel. Upon the request of the minor’s counsel, for good cause shown, and after notice to the petitioner and all other persons receiving notice of the hearing, the court may continue the hearing once for a period not to exceed 96 hours.Any recommendation made by a state mental health facility or state hospital regarding the minor’s involuntary commitment may be admissible during the course of the hearing.

History.

1990, c. 975; 1991, c. 159; 1992, c. 539; 2001, c. 837; 2004, c. 283; 2005, c. 346; 2006, c. 401; 2007, cc. 500, 897; 2008, cc. 140, 776, 783, 807, 808; 2009, cc. 455, 555; 2010, cc. 778, 825; 2018, c. 568.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 837, in the last sentence of the first paragraph of subsection B, deleted “or other” preceding “legal holiday,” inserted “or day on which the court is lawfully closed,” preceding “the seventy-two hours,” deleted “or” preceding “legal holiday,” inserted “or day on which the court is lawfully closed” following “legal holiday” and deleted the last sentence, which read: “In no case may the time period between the filing of the petition and the hearing under §

16.1-344

exceed ninety-six hours.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 283 inserted “serving the jurisdiction in which the minor is located” in the first paragraph of subsections A and B; and substituted “24” for “twenty-four” and “72” for “seventy-two” throughout the section.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 346 added the language beginning “including the person having custody” in the first sentence of the first paragraph in subsection A; and added the last sentence in the first paragraph of subsection B.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 401 added the last paragraph to the end of subsection B.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 500 and 897 are identical, and deleted “by a juvenile and domestic relations district judge” following “scheduled” in the last paragraph of subsection A.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 140 and 776 are identical, and inserted “or withdrawn” in the first sentence of the second paragraph in subsection B.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 783 and 808 are identical, and substituted “96” for “72” throughout this section; inserted “or withdrawn” following “If the petition is not dismissed” in the first sentence of the second paragraph of subsection B.

The 2008 amendment by c. 807, in subsection B, inserted “the guardian ad litem for the minor” in the third sentence of the first paragraph, and inserted “a guardian ad litem for the minor and” in the second sentence of the second paragraph.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 455 and 555 are identical, and inserted the next-to-last sentence in the first paragraph in subsection A; and substituted “located shall schedule” for “located may schedule” in the first sentence in subsection B.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical, and in subsection B, in the first paragraph, inserted “or from the issuance of the temporary detention order as provided in §

16.1-340.1

, whichever occurs later, or from the time of the hearing held pursuant to subsection C of §

16.1-339

if the commitment hearing has been conducted pursuant to subdivision C 3 of §

16.1-339

” and in the second paragraph, inserted “by the sheriffs of the jurisdictions in which the minor and his parents are located.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 568 inserted the second sentence in the second paragraph of subsection B.

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

§ 16.1-342.
Involuntary commitment; clinical evaluation.

Upon the filing of a petition for involuntary commitment, the juvenile and domestic relations district court shall direct the community services board serving the area in which the minor is located to arrange for an evaluation by a qualified evaluator, if one has not already been performed pursuant to subsection B of §

16.1-339

. All such evaluations shall be conducted in private. In conducting a clinical evaluation of a minor in detention or shelter care, if the evaluator finds, irrespective of the fact that the minor has been detained, that the minor meets the criteria for involuntary commitment in §

16.1-345

, the evaluator shall recommend that the minor meets the criteria for involuntary commitment. The petitioner, all public agencies, and all providers or programs which have treated or who are treating the minor, shall cooperate with the evaluator and shall promptly deliver, upon request and without charge, all records of treatment or education of the minor. At least 24 hours before the scheduled hearing, the evaluator shall submit to the court a written report which includes the evaluator’s opinion regarding whether the minor meets the criteria for involuntary commitment specified in §

16.1-345

. A copy of the evaluator’s report shall be provided to the minor’s guardian ad litem and to the minor’s counsel. The evaluator, if not physically present at the hearing, shall be available for questioning during the hearing through a two-way electronic video and audio or telephonic communication system as authorized in §

16.1-345.1

. When the qualified evaluator attends the hearing in person or by electronic communication, he shall not be excluded from the hearing pursuant to an order of sequestration of witnesses.

Any evaluation conducted pursuant to this section shall be a comprehensive evaluation of the minor conducted in-person or, if that is not practicable, by a two-way electronic video and audio communication system as authorized in §

16.1-345.1

. Translation or interpreter services shall be provided during the evaluation where necessary. The examination shall consist of (i) a clinical assessment that includes a mental status examination; determination of current use of psychotropic and other medications; a medical and psychiatric history; a substance use, abuse, or dependency determination; and a determination of the likelihood that, because of mental illness, the minor is experiencing a serious deterioration of his ability to care for himself in a developmentally age-appropriate manner, as evidenced by delusionary thinking or by a significant impairment of functioning in hydration, nutrition, self-protection, or self-control; (ii) a substance abuse screening, when indicated; (iii) a risk assessment that includes an evaluation of the likelihood that, because of mental illness, the minor presents a serious danger to himself or others to the extent that severe or irremediable injury is likely to result, as evidenced by recent acts or threats; (iv) for a minor 14 years of age or older, an assessment of the minor’s capacity to consent to treatment, including his ability to maintain and communicate choice, understand relevant information, and comprehend the situation and its consequences; (v) if prior to the examination the minor has been temporarily detained pursuant to this article, a review of the temporary detention facility’s records for the minor, including the treating physician’s evaluation, any collateral information, reports of any laboratory or toxicology tests conducted, and all admission forms and nurses’ notes; (vi) a discussion of treatment preferences expressed by the minor or his parents or contained in a document provided by the minor or his parents in support of recovery; (vii) an assessment of alternatives to involuntary inpatient treatment; and (viii) recommendations for the placement, care, and treatment of the minor.

History.

1990, c. 975; 2005, c. 346; 2009, cc. 455, 555; 2010, cc. 778, 825.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 346 inserted the second sentence and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 455 and 555 are identical, and inserted the present next-to-last sentence and substituted “evaluator, if not physically present at the hearing, shall be available whenever possible for questioning during the hearing through a two-way electronic video and audio or telephonic communication system as authorized in §

16.1-345.1

” for “evaluator shall attend the hearing as a witness” in the last sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical and, designated prior exiting provisions as subsection A and added subsection B; and in subsection A, inserted “by a qualified evaluator,” deleted “by a qualified evaluator who is not and will not be treating the minor and who has no significant financial interest in the facility to which the minor would be committed” from the end of the first sentence, added the second sentence, deleted “whenever possible” following “shall be available,” and added the last sentence.

§ 16.1-343.
Involuntary commitment; duties of attorney for the minor.

As far in advance as practicable after an attorney is appointed to represent a minor under this article, the minor’s attorney shall interview the minor; the minor’s parent, if available; the petitioner; and the qualified evaluator. He shall interview all other material witnesses, and examine all relevant diagnostic and other reports.

Any state or local agency, department, authority or institution and any school, hospital, physician or other health or mental health care provider shall permit the attorney appointed pursuant to this article to inspect and copy, without the consent of the minor or his parents, any records relating to the minor whom the attorney represents.

The obligation of the minor’s attorney during the hearing or appeal is to interview witnesses, obtain independent experts when possible, cross-examine adverse witnesses, present witnesses on behalf of the minor, articulate the wishes of the minor, and otherwise fully represent the minor in the proceeding. Counsel appointed by the court shall be compensated in an amount not to exceed $100.

History.

1990, c. 975; 1993, c. 344; 2004, cc. 66, 1014; 2008, c. 807; 2010, cc. 778, 825.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 66 and 1014 are identical, and inserted the present second paragraph.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 807 inserted “any action taken pursuant to the filing of a petition under §

16.1-339

” in the first sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical, and rewrote the first sentence, which formerly read: “As far as possible in advance of any action taken pursuant to the filing of a petition under §

16.1-339

, a hearing conducted under §

16.1-344

, or an appeal from such a hearing, the minor’s attorney shall interview the minor; the minor’s parent, if available; the petitioner; and the qualified evaluator.”

§ 16.1-344.
Involuntary commitment; hearing.

The court shall summon to the hearing all material witnesses requested by either the minor or the petitioner. All testimony shall be under oath. The rules of evidence shall apply. The petitioner, minor and, with leave of court for good cause shown, any other person shall be given the opportunity to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses. The hearing shall be closed to the public unless the minor and petitioner request that it be open.

At the commencement of the hearing involving a minor 14 years of age or older, the court shall inform the minor whose involuntary commitment is being sought of his right to be voluntarily admitted for inpatient treatment as provided for in §

16.1-338

and shall afford the minor an opportunity for voluntary admission, provided that the minor’s parent consents to such voluntary admission. The court shall advise the minor whose involuntary commitment is being sought that if the minor chooses to be voluntarily admitted pursuant to §

16.1-338

, such minor will be prohibited from possessing, purchasing, or transporting a firearm pursuant to §

18.2-308.1:3

. In determining whether a minor is capable of consenting to voluntary admission, the court may consider evidence regarding the minor’s past compliance or noncompliance with treatment.

An employee or a designee of the community services board that arranged for the evaluation of the minor shall attend the hearing in person or, if physical attendance is not practicable, shall participate in the hearing through a two-way electronic video and audio or telephonic communication system as authorized in §

16.1-345.1

. If (i) the minor does not reside in the jurisdiction served by the juvenile and domestic relations district court that conducts the hearing and (ii) the minor is being considered for mandatory outpatient treatment pursuant to §

16.1-345.2

, an employee or designee of the community services board serving the area where the minor resides shall also attend the hearing in person or, if physical attendance is not practicable, shall participate in the hearing through a two-way electronic video and audio or telephonic communication system as authorized in §

16.1-345.1

. The employee or designee of the community services board serving the area where the minor resides may, instead of attending the hearing, make arrangements with the community services board that arranged for the evaluation of the minor to present on its behalf the recommendations for a specific course of treatment and programs for the provision of mandatory outpatient treatment required by subsection C of §

16.1-345.2

and the initial mandatory outpatient treatment plan required by subsection D of §

16.1-345.2

. When a community services board attends the hearing on behalf of the community services board serving the area where the minor resides, the attending community services board shall inform the community services board serving the area where the minor resides of the disposition of the matter upon the conclusion of the hearing. In addition, the attending community services board shall transmit the disposition through certified mail, personal delivery, facsimile with return receipt acknowledged, or other electronic means to the community services board serving the area where the minor resides. Any employee or designee of the community services board attending or participating in the hearing shall not be excluded from the hearing pursuant to an order of sequestration of witnesses.At least 12 hours prior to the hearing, the court shall provide the time and location of the hearing to the community services board that arranged for the evaluation of the minor. If the community services board will be present by telephonic means, the court shall provide the telephone number to the board.

History.

1990, c. 975; 1992, c. 539; 2009, cc. 455, 555; 2010, cc. 778, 825; 2018, c. 846.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 455 and 555 are identical, and substituted “evidence unless objected to by the minor or his attorney, in which case the evaluator shall attend the hearing in person or by electronic communication” for “evidence by stipulation of the parties” in the third sentence in the first paragraph; and added the last two paragraphs.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical, and designated the former first paragraph as subsection A and the former second and third paragraphs as subsection C; added subsection B; in subsection A, deleted “however, the evaluator’s report required by §

16.1-342

shall be admissible into evidence unless objected to by the minor or his attorney, in which case the evaluator shall attend the hearing in person or by electronic communication” from the end of the third sentence and deleted the last two sentences, which read: “Within 30 days of any final order committing the minor or dismissing the petition, the minor or petitioner shall have the right to appeal de novo to the circuit court having jurisdiction where the minor was committed or where the minor is hospitalized pursuant to the commitment order. The juvenile and domestic relations district court shall appoint an attorney to represent any minor desiring to appeal who does not appear to be already represented”; and in subsection C, in the first paragraph, added the last sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 846, effective April 18, 2018, inserted the second sentence in subsection B.